Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.350

Adverse change in contract status of certificated employee, including nonrenewal of contract—Appeal from—Costs, attorney's fee and damages.

If the court enters judgment for the employee, and if the court finds that the probable cause determination was made in bad faith or upon insufficient legal grounds, the court in its discretion may award to the employee a reasonable attorneys' fee for the preparation and trial of his or her appeal, together with his or her taxable costs in the superior court. If the court enters judgment for the employee, in addition to ordering the school board to reinstate or issue a new contract to the employee, the court may award damages for loss of compensation incurred by the employee by reason of the action of the school district.

[ 1990 c 33 s 399; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 34 s 16; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.490. Prior: 1961 c 241 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.58.490, 28.58.490.]

NOTES:

Savings—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114: See notes following RCW 28A.400.010.